Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1013.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Election Report Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of State of the Commonwealth."Election." Any election held under the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, that occurs after the effective date of this section.Section 3. Report.(a) Report.--The department shall submit a report regarding the following complaints by individuals registered to vote in 123456789101112131415161718 this Commonwealth relating to an election:(1) Complaints submitted to the Bureau of Commissions, Elections and Legislation of the department regarding violations of 52 U.S.C. Ch. 209 (relating to election administration improvement).(2) Complaints submitted to the department through the department's formal election complaint publicly accessible Internet website.(3) Complaints submitted to the department through the publicly accessible election day hotline.(b) Contents.--The information in the report under subsection (a) shall include the complaint, polling precinct and county in which the complaint originated and what actions the department took in regard to the complaint. Anonymous complaints shall be excluded from the report.(c) Submission.--Within 45 days of the election, the department shall submit a report detailing complaints that were received within five days of the election to the following:(1) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(2) The Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the Senate.(3) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.(4) The Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(5) The Secretary of the Senate.(6) The Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives.(7) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the State Government Committee of the Senate.(8) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the State Government Committee of the House of Representatives.20250SB1013PN1174 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB1013PN1174 - 3 - 12